en: Gardening fork type: Aerating fork; Ballast fork; Border fork; Broadfork; Compost fork; Digging fork; Hand fork; Heavy-duty garden fork; Light-duty garden fork; Manure fork; Mini fork; Pitchfork; Potato fork; Weeding fork; Other
pt-PT: Tipo de ancinho de jardinagem: Forquilha de aeração; Forquilha de lastro; Forquilha de bordadura; Forquilha larga; Forquilha de compostagem; Forquilha de cavar; Forquilha de mão; Forquilha de jardim robusta; Forquilha de jardim leve; Forquilha de estrume; Mini forquilha; Forquilha agrícola; Forquilha para batatas; Forquilha para ervas daninhas; Outro
hu: Vasvilla típusa: Levegőztető villa; Ballasztvilla; Szegélyvilla; Széles villa; Komposztvilla; Ásóvilla; Kézi villa; Nagy teherbírású kerti villa; Kis teherbírású kerti villa; Trágyavilla; Mini villa; Vasvilla; Burgonyavilla; Gyomláló villa; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип градинска вилица: Аерираща вила; Баластна вила; Вила за бордюрни граници; Широка вила; Вила за компост; Вила за копаене; Ръчна вила; Градинска вила за тежка работа; Градинска вила за леки товари; Вила за тор; Мини вила; Вила за сено; Вила за картофи; Вила за плевене; Друго
fi: Puutarhahaarukan tyyppi: Ilmastustalikko; Talikko; Reunatalikko; Leveä talikko; Kompostitalikko; Kaivutalikko; Käsitalikko; Raskas puutarhatalikko; Kevyt puutarhatalikko; Lantatalikko; Minitalikko; Talikko; Perunatalikko; Kitkemistalikko; Muu
cs: Typ rycích vidlí: Provzdušňovací vidle; Vidle na štěrk; Záhonové rycí vidle; Široké vidle; Kompostové vidle; Rycí vidle; Ruční vidle; Robustní rycí vidle; Zahradní vidle pro lehčí práce; Vidle na hnůj; Malé ruční vidle; Vidle na seno; Vidle na brambory; Vidle na plevel; Jiné
es: Tipo de horquilla de jardinería: Horquilla aireadora; Horquilla de lastre; Bifurcación fronteriza; Horca ancha; Horquilla para compost; Horquilla de excavación; Horquilla de mano; Horquilla de jardín de aranceles pesados; Horquilla de jardín Light-aranceles; Horquilla para estiércol; Mini horquilla; Horca; Horquilla de patata; Horquilla desherbadora; Otros
ja: ガーデニングフォークのタイプ: エアレーションフォーク; バラストフォーク; ボーダーフォーク; ブロードフォーク; コンポストフォーク; 掘削フォーク; ハンドフォーク; ヘビーデューティーガーデンフォーク; ライトデューティーガーデンフォーク; 肥料フォーク; ミニフォーク; ピッチフォーク; ポテトフォーク; 草取りフォーク; その他
de: Mistgabeltyp: Belüftungsgabel; Staudengabel; Border Fork; Broadfork; Kompostgabel; Grabegabel; Handgabel; Spatengabel, extra stabil; Spatengabel, extra leicht; Mistgabel; Mini-Gabel; Heugabel; Kartoffelgabel; Unkrautgabel; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 园艺叉类型: 松土叉; 压载叉; 边篱叉; 宽叉; 堆肥叉; 挖掘叉; 手持叉; 重型园艺叉; 轻型园艺叉; 粪肥叉; 迷你叉; 干草叉; 土豆叉; 除草叉; 其他
nb: Type høygaffel: Luftegaffel; Ballastgaffel; Grenseforgrening; Bredgaffel; Kompostgaffel; Gravegaffel; Håndgaffel; Kraftig hagegaffel; Lett hagegaffel; Gjødselgaffel; Minigaffel; Høygaffel; Potetgaffel; Ugressgaffel; Annet
vi: Loại xẻng làm vườn: Nĩa xới thông khí; Nĩa xúc đá ba-lát; Nĩa làm cỏ mép vườn; Nĩa bản rộng; Nĩa xúc phân ủ; Nĩa đào đất; Nĩa cầm tay; Nĩa làm vườn chuyên dụng; Nĩa làm vườn loại nhẹ; Nĩa xúc phân chuồng; Nĩa mini; Chĩa xúc rơm; Nĩa thu hoạch khoai tây; Nĩa nhổ cỏ; Khác
sl-SI: Vrsta vrtnih vil: Vilice za prezračevanje; Vilice za balast; Mejna razcepitev; Broadfork; Vile za kompost; Vile za kopanje; Ročne vilice; Močne vrtne vile; Lahke vrtne vile; Vile za gnoj; Mini vilice; Vile; Vilice za krompir; Vile za pletje; Druga
nl: Type tuinvork: Beluchtingsvork; Ballastvork; Grensvork; Breedvork; Compostvork; Graafvork; Handvork; Zware tuinvork; Lichte tuinvork; Mestvork; Mini vorkje; Hooivork; Aardappelvork; Wiedvork; Overig
th: ประเภทของส้อมพรวนดิน: ส้อมพรวนดินเติมอากาศ; ส้อมตักวัสดุหยาบ; ส้อมพรวนดินขนาดเล็ก; ส้อมพรวนดินแบบกว้าง; ส้อมกลับปุ๋ยหมัก; ส้อมขุดดิน; ส้อมพรวนดินด้ามสั้น; ส้อมทำสวนงานหนัก; ส้อมทำสวนงานเบา; ส้อมตักปุ๋ยคอก; ส้อมพรวนดินขนาดเล็กพิเศษ; ส้อมตักฟาง; ส้อมขุดมันฝรั่ง; ส้อมกำจัดวัชพืช; อื่นๆ
da: Havegrebstype: Luftningsfork; Ballastfork; Grænsefork; Grelinette; Kompostgaffel; Gravefork; Håndfork; Havefork til tungt løft; Havefork til let løft; Gødningsfork; Minifork; Høtyv; Kartoffelfork; Lugningsfork; Andet
lt-LT: Sodo šakių tipas: Aeravimo šakė; Balasto šakė; Kraštinė šakė; Plati šakė; Komposto šakė; Kasimo šakė; Rankinė šakė; Didelės apkrovos sodo šakė; Mažos apkrovos sodo šakė; Mėšlo šakės; Mini šakė; Šakė; Bulvių šakė; Ravėjimo šakė; Kita
sv: Typ av trädgårdsgaffel: Luftningsgaffel; Ballastgaffel; Gränsförgrening; Bredgaffel; Kompostgaffel; Grävgaffel; Handgaffel; Extra stark trädgårdsgrep; Lätt trädgårdsgrep; Gödselgaffel; Minigaffel; Högaffel; Potatisgaffel; Ogräsrensningsgaffel; Övrigt
hr-HR: Vrsta vrtlarske vile: Vile za prozračivanje; Vile za balast; Vile za gredice; Široke vile; Vile za kompost; Vile za kopanje; Ručne vile; Vrtne vile za teške uvjete rada; Lagane vrtne vile; Vile za gnojivo; Mini vile; Vile za sijeno; Vile za krumpir; Vile za odstranjivanje korova; Ostalo
pl: Typ wideł ogrodowych: Widły napowietrzające; Widły balastowe; Widły rabatowe; Widły dwuręczne; Widły do kompostu; Widły do kopania; Widełki ręczne; Widły ogrodowe wzmocnione; Widły ogrodowe lekkie; Widły do obornika; Małe widły; Widły rolnicze; Widły do ziemniaków; Widełki do pielenia; Pozostałe
tr: Bahçe çatalı tipi: Havalandırma çatalı; Balast çatalı; Sınır çatalı; Geniş Çatal; Kompost çatalı; Kazma çatalı; El çatalı; Ağır hizmet tipi bahçe çatalı; Hafif hizmet tipi bahçe çatalı; Gübre çatalı; Mini çatal; Dirgen; Patates çatalı; Ot ayıklama çatalı; Diğer
ko: 원예용 포크 유형: 통기 포크; 밸러스트 포크; 보더 포크; 브로드포크; 퇴비 포크; 굴착용 포크; 핸드 포크; 헤비듀티 가든 포크; 라이트듀티 가든 포크; 거름 포크; 미니 포크; 피치포크; 감자 포크; 잡초 제거용 포크; 기타
ru: Тип садовых вил: Аэрационные вилы; Балластные вилы; Кромочные вилы; Рыхлитель-аэратор; Вилы для компоста; Перекопочные вилы; Ручные вилы; Усиленные садовые вилы; Облегченные садовые вилы; Вилы для навоза; Мини-вилы; Сенные вилы; Вилы для картофеля; Вилы для прополки; Другое
fr: Type de fourche de jardinage: Fourche d’aération; Fourche de ballast; Fourche de bordure; Grelinette; Fourche à compost; Fourche à bêcher; Fourche à main; Fourche de jardin robuste; Fourche de jardin légère; Fourche à fumier; Mini fourche; Fourche; Fourche à pommes de terre; Fourche à désherber; Autre
it: Tipo di forchetta da giardinaggio: Forcella di aerazione; Forcella di zavorra; Forcella di confine; Forchetta larga; Forchetta da compost; Forchetta da scavo; Forchetta a mano; Forchetta resistente da giardino; Forchetta da giardino per lavori leggeri; Forchetta per letame; Mini forchetta; Forcone; Forchetta per patate; Forchetta da diserbo; Altro
sk-SK: Typ záhradníckych vidlí: Prevzdušňovacia vidlica; Vidly na štrk; Zákonové vidly; Široké vidly s dvomi rukoväťami; Vidly na kompost; Rýľovacie vidly; Malé záhradné vidly; Pevné záhradné vidly; Ľahké záhradné vidly; Vidly na hnoj; Mini vidly; Vidly; Vidly na zemiaky; Vidly na odburiňovanie; Iné
pt-BR: Tipo de garfo de jardinagem: Garfo aerador; Garfo de lastro; Garfo de borda; Broadfork; Garfo para compostagem; Garfo de escavação; Garfo de mão; Garfo de jardim reforçado; Garfo de jardim leve; Garfo para esterco; Mini garfo; Forcado; Garfo de batata; Garfo para capinar; Outro
zh-TW: 園藝叉類型: 通氣叉; 壓載叉; 邊界叉; 寬叉; 堆肥叉; 挖掘叉; 迷你三爪叉; 耐用園藝叉; 輕型園藝叉; 糞叉; 迷你叉; 乾草叉; 馬鈴薯叉; 除草叉; 其他
el: Τύπος πιρούνας κήπου: Πιρούνα αερισμού; Πιρούνα για έρμα; Πιρούνα παρτεριού; Πλατιά πιρούνα (broadfork); Πιρούνα κομπόστ; Σκαπτική πιρούνα; Χειροπιρούνα; Πιρούνα κήπου μεγάλης αντοχής; Ελαφριά πιρούνα κήπου; Πιρούνα κοπριάς; Μίνι πιρούνα; Δίκρανο; Πιρούνα πατάτας; Πιρούνα βοτανίσματος; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tip de furcă de grădinărit: Furcă de aerare; Furcă de balast; Furcă pentru marginea grădinii; Furcă lată; Furcă de compost; Furcă de săpat; Furcă manuală; Furcă de grădină rezistentă; Furcă de grădină ușoară; Furcă pentru gunoi de grajd; Furcă mică; Furcă pentru fân; Furcă pentru cartofi; Furcă de plivit; Altele